src/morphology/affixes/numbers.lexc
!! !!!East Mari Numeral inflection

LEXICON QNT_  !!= * @CODE@
+Qnt: # ;

LEXICON KvMurt !!= * @CODE@
+Num: # ;

LEXICON KvK !!= * @CODE@ cardinal numerals
+Num: # ;


LEXICON KvKoll !!= * @CODE@
+Num: # ;

LEXICON KvInd !!= * @CODE@
+Num: # ;

LEXICON KvO !!= * @CODE@ Ordinals, also non-numerals (hmm, change?)
+Num+Ord: # ;


LEXICON Kv-a/e  !!= * @CODE@
+Num: # ;
